Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1259
Water skis, aquaplane, or similar device; operation; time restrictions.

No motorboat shall have in tow or shall otherwise be assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane, or a similar contrivance from the period of one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour prior to sunrise, except that this section shall not apply to motorboats used in duly authorized water ski tournaments, competitions, or exhibitions or trials therefor when adequate lighting is provided.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 59;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 41.